Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-386.04
Unincorporated mutual associations; books and records; open to inspection by department.

The books and records of every such association and every officer, director, or employee thereof shall be subject to the inspection and examination of the Department of Insurance. Upon at least ten days' written notice to the president or secretary of the association, the Director of Insurance may require that the books and records be brought to the Department of Insurance for inspection and examination.

Laws 1963, c. 268, § 5, p. 803;

Laws 1969, c. 367, § 3, p. 1305.